North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 1. Definitions, General Provisions and Remedies.

Part 1. General Provisions.

§ 130A-1.
Title.

This Chapter shall be known as the Public Health Law of North Carolina.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2.

Public Health Improvement Plan.

Session Laws 2009-451, s. 10.26(a)-(i), provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) shall develop a five-year Public Health Improvement Plan (Plan) by March 31, 2010. In developing the Plan the Secretary shall:

“(1) Adopt a list of services and activities performed by local health departments that qualify as core public health functions of statewide significance.

“(2) Adopt a list of performance measures with the intent of improving health status indicators applicable to core public health functions of statewide significance that local health departments (LHDs) must provide.

“(3) Identify a set of health status indicators to be given priority by LHDs.

“Under the Plan, all priorities and health status indicators must incorporate as an essential activity the disparity of diseases amongst populations and locales.

“(b) In order for measurable benefits to be realized through the implementation of the Plan, the Plan shall include the adoption of levels of performance necessary to promote:

“(1) Uniformity across local health departments,

“(2) Best evidence-based services,

“(3) National standards of performance,

“(4) Innovations in public health practice, and

“(5) Reduction of geographic and racial health disparities.

“LHDs shall have the flexibility and opportunity to use the resources available to achieve the required performance measures in a manner that best suits the LHD.

“(c) The Plan will address the need to provide county health departments with financial incentives to encourage and increase local investment in public health functions. County governments shall not supplant existing local funding with State incentive
resources. The Secretary may revise the list of activities and performance measures as appropriate, but before doing so, the Secretary shall provide a written explanation of the rationale for the addition, deletion, or revision.

“(d) In developing the Plan the Secretary shall establish and chair the Public Health Improvement Plan Task Force (Task Force), the members and expertise of which shall include:

“(1) Local health departments,

“(2) Department staff,

“(3) Individuals and entities with expertise in the development of performance measures, accountability, and systems management,

“(4) Experts in development of evidence-based medical guidelines or public health practice guidelines, and

“(5) Individuals and entities that will be affected by the performance measures.

“(e) The implementation schedule for the Plan shall be as follows:

“(1) July 1, 2009, establish the Task Force to develop the Plan,

“(2) March 31, 2010, submit the Plan to the 2010 Regular Session of the 2009 General Assembly,

“(3) July 1, 2010, implement the Plan, and

“(4) November 15, 2011, and annually thereafter, report on Plan implementation.

“(f) The Department will identify the programmatic activities and funding in the Division of Public Health associated with the core functions and activities in the Plan. Funds associated with these activities shall be subject to a flexible spending formula
adopted by the Department, as follows:

“(1) Beginning in SFY 2010-2011, the flexible spending formula will begin to replace the current spending with a more effective method of funding public health activities at the local level and achieving the results expected.

“(2) The Task Force shall identify a reliable and consistent source of State revenue to fund the flexible spending formula.

“(3) If sufficient additional revenue is available to implement the Plan, a separate set-aside of available funds would be created. This set-aside would be available to contiguous LHDs that seek to address a specific women’s health, child health, or adult
health disease or chronic condition, and in doing so, choose to merge into a single Local Health District, thus saving administrative dollars to be focused on public health issues.

“(g) Funds appropriated to the Department for flexible spending shall be distributed to county health departments as follows:

“(1) Each of the county health departments will receive a base amount to be determined by the DHHS.

“(2) The balance of funds in the Flexible Spending Account is to be distributed to the counties on the basis of a formula that takes into consideration the following elements:

“a. Population,

“b. Per capita income,

“c. Rates of:

“1. Infant mortality,

“2. Teenage pregnancy,

“3. Tobacco use,

“4. Cancer,

“5. Heart disease,

“6. Diabetes, and

“7. Stroke.

“d. Percent of minorities in the county,

“e. Body Mass Index (BMI) of public school students, and

“f. Other factors as the Secretary may find necessary to achieve the goals of the Plan.

“(3) The use of the funds by the LHD would reflect the core public health functions. It will be incumbent upon the LHD to use the funds in a manner that assures its achievement of the performance measures adopted by the Secretary.

“(h) To ensure compliance with Department directives, the Task Force shall consider requiring each county health department to submit to the Secretary such data as the Secretary determines is necessary to allow the Secretary to assess whether the county
health department has used the funds in a manner consistent with achieving the performance measures associated with this Plan.

“(i) Beginning November 15, 2011, and biannually thereafter, the Secretary shall report to the Governor and the General Assembly on:

“(1) The distribution of funds to LHDs,

“(2) The use of these funds by LHDs,

“(3) The specific effect the funding from this Plan has had on:

“a. LHDs’ performance,

“b. Health status indicators, and

“c. Health disparities.

“The Secretary’s initial report will focus on implementation. Subsequent reports will evaluate trends in performance and expenditures.”

Session Laws 2009-451, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2009’.”

Session Laws 2009-451, s. 28.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for,
and activities occurring during, the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws 2009-451, s. 28.5, is a severability clause.

§ 130A-1.1.
Mission and essential services.

The General Assembly recognizes that unified purpose and direction of the public health system is necessary to ensure that all citizens in the State have equal access to essential public health services. The General Assembly declares that the mission
of the public health system is to promote and contribute to the highest level of health possible for the people of North Carolina by:

Preventing health risks and disease;

Identifying and reducing health risks in the community;

Detecting, investigating, and preventing the spread of disease;

Promoting healthy lifestyles;

Promoting a safe and healthful environment;

Promoting the availability and accessibility of quality health care services through the private sector; and

Providing quality health care services when not otherwise available.

A local health department shall ensure that the following 10 essential public health services are available and accessible to the population in each county served by the local health department:

Monitoring health status to identify community health problems.

Diagnosing and investigating health hazards in the community.

Informing, educating, and empowering people about health issues.

Mobilizing community partnerships to identify and solve health problems.

Developing policies and plans that support individual and community health efforts.

Enforcing laws and regulations that protect health and ensure safety.

Linking people to needed personal health care services and ensuring the provision of health care when otherwise unavailable.

Ensuring a competent public health workforce and personal health care workforce.

Evaluating effectiveness, accessibility, and quality of personal and population-based health services.

Conducting research.

The General Assembly recognizes that there are health-related services currently provided by State and local government and the private sector that are important to maintaining a healthy social and ecological environment but that are not included on the
list of essential public health services required under this section. Omission of these services from the list of essential public health services shall not be construed as an intent to prohibit or decrease their availability.
Rather, such omission means only that the omitted services may be more appropriately assured by government agencies or private entities other than the public health system.

The list of essential public health services required by this section shall not be construed to limit or restrict the powers and duties of the Commission for Public Health or the Departments of Environmental Quality and Health and Human Services as otherwise
conferred by State law.

History.
1991, c. 299, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.54; 2007-182, s. 2; 2009-442, s. 1; 2012-126, s. 4; 2012-194, s. 62; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

Cross References.

As to the Hospital Authorities Act, see

G.S. 131E-15

.

§ 130A-2.
Definitions.

The following definitions shall apply throughout this Chapter unless otherwise specified:

“Accreditation board” or “Board” means the Local Health Department Accreditation Board.

(1a)
“Commission” means the Commission for Public Health.

(1b)
“Communicable condition” means the state of being infected with a communicable agent but without symptoms.

(1c)
“Communicable disease” means an illness due to an infectious agent or its toxic products which is transmitted directly or indirectly to a person from an infected person or animal through the agency of an intermediate
animal, host, or vector, or through the inanimate environment.

“Department” means the Department of Health and Human Services.

“Imminent hazard” means a situation that is likely to cause an immediate threat to human life, an immediate threat of serious physical injury, an immediate threat of serious adverse health effects, or a serious risk of irreparable damage to the environment
if no immediate action is taken.

(3a)
“Isolation authority” means the authority to issue an order to limit the freedom of movement or action of persons or animals that are infected or reasonably suspected to be infected with a communicable disease
or communicable condition for the period of communicability to prevent the direct or indirect conveyance of the infectious agent from the person or animal to other persons or animals who are susceptible or who may spread the
agent to others.

“Local board of health” means a district board of health or a public health authority board or a county board of health.

“Local health department” means a district health department or a public health authority or a county health department.

“Local health director” means the administrative head of a local health department appointed pursuant to this Chapter.

(6a)
“Outbreak” means an occurrence of a case or cases of a disease in a locale in excess of the usual number of cases of the disease.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, company, association, partnership, unit of local government or other legal entity.

(7a)
“Quarantine authority” means the authority to issue an order to limit the freedom of movement or action of persons or animals which have been exposed to or are reasonably suspected of having been exposed to a communicable
disease or communicable condition for a period of time as may be necessary to prevent the spread of that disease. Quarantine authority also means the authority to issue an order to limit access by any person or animal to an
area or facility that may be contaminated with an infectious agent. The term also means the authority to issue an order to limit the freedom of movement or action of persons who have not received immunizations against a communicable
disease when the State Health Director or a local health director determines that the immunizations are required to control an outbreak of that disease.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Health and Human Services.

“Unit of local government” means a county, city, consolidated city-county, sanitary district or other local political subdivision, authority or agency of local government.

“Vital records” means birth, death, fetal death, marriage, annulment and divorce records registered under the provisions of Article 4 of this Chapter.

History.
1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1963, c. 492, ss. 5, 6; 1967, c. 343, s. 2; c. 1257, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1975, c. 751, s. 1; 1981, c. 130, s. 1; c. 340, ss. 1-4; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1989, c. 727, s. 141; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990),
c. 1004, s. 19(b); 1991, c. 631, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.55; 1997-502, s. 2(a), (b); 2002-179, s. 4; 2004-80, s. 1; 2005-369, s. 1(a); 2007-182, s. 2.

Local Modification to Former § 130-3.

Cumberland: 1965, c. 1152, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to provisions for regional solid waste management authorities, see

G.S. 153A-421

et seq.

§ 130A-3.
Appointment of the State Health Director.

The Secretary shall appoint the State Health Director. The State Health Director shall be a physician licensed to practice medicine in this State. The State Health Director shall perform duties and exercise authority assigned by the Secretary.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-4.
Administration.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the Secretary shall administer and enforce the provisions of this Chapter and the rules of the Commission. A local health director shall administer the programs of the local health department and enforce
the rules of the local board of health.

When requested by the Secretary, a local health department shall enforce the rules of the Commission under the supervision of the Department. The local health department shall utilize local staff authorized by the Department to enforce the specific rules.

The Secretary of Environmental Quality shall administer and enforce the provisions of Articles 9 and 10 of this Chapter and the rules of the Commission and the Environmental Management Commission adopted thereunder.

When requested by the Secretary of Environmental Quality, a local health department shall enforce the rules of the Commission and the rules adopted by the Environmental Management Commission pursuant to

G.S. 87-87

under the supervision of the Department of Environmental Quality. The local health department shall utilize local staff authorized by the Department of Environmental Quality to enforce the specific rules.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1995, c. 123, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.56; 2001-474, s. 18; 2006-202, s. 5; 2006-255, s. 13.1; 2011-145, s. 13.3(pp); 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), (v); 2020-74, s. 12(a).

§ 130A-4.1.
State funds for maternal and child health care/nonsupplanting.

The Department shall ensure that local health departments do not reduce county appropriations for maternal and child health services provided by the local health departments because they have received State appropriations for this purpose.

All income earned by local health departments for maternal and child health programs supported in whole or in part from State or federal funds, received from the Department, shall be budgeted and expended by local health departments to further the objectives
of the program that generated the income.

History.
1991, c. 689, s. 170; 1997-443, s. 11A.57.

§ 130A-4.2.
State funds for health promotion/nonsupplanting.

The Department shall ensure that local health departments do not reduce county appropriations for health promotion services provided by the local health departments because they have received State appropriations for this purpose.

History.
1991, c. 689, s. 171; 1997-443, s. 11A.58.

§ 130A-4.3.
State funds for school nurses.

The Department shall use State funds appropriated for the School Nurse Funding Initiative to supplement and not supplant other State, local, or federal funds appropriated or allocated for this purpose. The Department shall ensure that communities maintain
their current level of effort and funding for school nurses. These funds shall not be used to fund nurses for State agencies. These funds shall be distributed to local health departments according to a formula that includes all
of the following:

School nurse-to-student ratio.

Percentage of students eligible for free or reduced-price meals.

Percentage of children in poverty.

Per capita income.

Eligibility as a low-wealth county.

Mortality rates for children between one and 19 years of age.

Percentage of students with chronic illnesses.

Percentage of county population consisting of minority persons.

The Division of Public Health shall ensure that school nurses funded with State funds (i) do not assist in any instructional or administrative duties associated with a school’s curriculum and (ii) perform all of the following with respect to school health
programs:

Serve as the coordinator of the health services program and provide nursing care.

Provide health education to students, staff, and parents.

Identify health and safety concerns in the school environment and promote a nurturing school environment.

Support healthy food services programs.

Promote healthy physical education, sports policies, and practices.

Provide health counseling, assess mental health needs, provide interventions, and refer students to appropriate school staff or community agencies.

Promote community involvement in assuring a healthy school and serve as school liaison to a health advisory committee.

Provide health education and counseling and promote healthy activities and a healthy environment for school staff.

Be available to assist the county health department during a public health emergency.

History.
2017-57, s. 11E.1.

§ 130A-4.4.
Funds for AIDS Drug Assistance Program. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Department shall work with the Department of Public Safety to use Department of Public Safety funds to purchase pharmaceuticals for the treatment of individuals in the custody of the Department of Public Safety who have been diagnosed with Human Immunodeficiency
Virus or Acquired Immune Deficiency Syndrome (HIV/AIDS) in a manner that allows these funds to be accounted for as State matching funds in the Department of Health and Human Services drawdown of federal Ryan White funds earmarked for
the AIDS Drug Assistance Program also known as ADAP.

History.
2017-57, s. 11E.7.

Implementation of Cost-Neutral Premium Assistance Program Within AIDS Drug Assistance Program (ADAP).

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 11E.8(a), (b), provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, shall continue to implement within the North Carolina AIDS Drug Assistance Program (ADAP) a health insurance premium assistance
program that (i) is cost neutral or achieves savings; (ii) utilizes federal funds from Part B of the Ryan White HIV/AIDS Program and ADAP funds to provide individual ADAP participants or subsets of ADAP participants with premium and
cost-sharing assistance for the purchase or maintenance of private health insurance coverage, including premiums, co-payments, and deductibles; and (iii) meets the requirements of Section 12E.1 of S.L. 2016-94.

“(b) By March 1, 2018, the Department shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division on implementation of the health insurance premium assistance program authorized by subsection
(a) of this section. The report must include at least all of the following components:

“(1) A detailed explanation of the program design.

“(2) A demonstration of cost neutrality, which shall include a comparison of the cost of providing prescription drugs to eligible beneficiaries through the health insurance premium program created pursuant to subsection (a) of this section and the cost
of providing prescription drugs to eligible beneficiaries through the existing ADAP program.

“(3) Information on health outcomes of program participants.

“(4) Any obstacles to program implementation.”

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 11E.9, provides: “Beginning January 1, 2018, the Department of Health and Human Services shall implement the use of the Modified Adjusted Gross Income formula in the calculation of income for the purpose of determining eligibility
for the AIDS Drug Assistance Program in order to ensure consistency in the Department’s methods of determining eligibility for other benefit programs.”

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2017.’ ”

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 39.6, is a severability clause.

Report on Premium Assistance Program Within AIDS Drug Assistance Program

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9G.3, provides: “Upon a determination by the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, that, in six months or less, it will no longer be feasible to operate the health insurance premium assistance program
implemented within the North Carolina AIDS Drug Assistance Program (ADAP) on a cost-neutral basis or in a manner that achieves savings to the State, the Department shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee
on Health and Human Services notifying the Committee of this determination along with supporting documentation and a proposed course of action with respect to health insurance premium assistance program participants.”

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(n), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult
Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of
Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the
departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

§ 130A-4.4.
Funds for AIDS Drug Assistance Program. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Department shall work with the Department of Adult Correction to use Department of Adult Correction funds to purchase pharmaceuticals for the treatment of individuals in the custody of the Department of Adult Correction who have been diagnosed with
Human Immunodeficiency Virus or Acquired Immune Deficiency Syndrome (HIV/AIDS) in a manner that allows these funds to be accounted for as State matching funds in the Department of Health and Human Services drawdown of federal Ryan
White funds earmarked for the AIDS Drug Assistance Program also known as ADAP.

History.
2017-57, s. 11E.7; 2021-180, s. 19C.9(n).

Implementation of Cost-Neutral Premium Assistance Program Within AIDS Drug Assistance Program (ADAP).

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 11E.8(a), (b), provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, shall continue to implement within the North Carolina AIDS Drug Assistance Program (ADAP) a health insurance premium assistance
program that (i) is cost neutral or achieves savings; (ii) utilizes federal funds from Part B of the Ryan White HIV/AIDS Program and ADAP funds to provide individual ADAP participants or subsets of ADAP participants with premium and
cost-sharing assistance for the purchase or maintenance of private health insurance coverage, including premiums, co-payments, and deductibles; and (iii) meets the requirements of Section 12E.1 of S.L. 2016-94.

“(b) By March 1, 2018, the Department shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division on implementation of the health insurance premium assistance program authorized by subsection
(a) of this section. The report must include at least all of the following components:

“(1) A detailed explanation of the program design.

“(2) A demonstration of cost neutrality, which shall include a comparison of the cost of providing prescription drugs to eligible beneficiaries through the health insurance premium program created pursuant to subsection (a) of this section and the cost
of providing prescription drugs to eligible beneficiaries through the existing ADAP program.

“(3) Information on health outcomes of program participants.

“(4) Any obstacles to program implementation.”

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 11E.9, provides: “Beginning January 1, 2018, the Department of Health and Human Services shall implement the use of the Modified Adjusted Gross Income formula in the calculation of income for the purpose of determining eligibility
for the AIDS Drug Assistance Program in order to ensure consistency in the Department’s methods of determining eligibility for other benefit programs.”

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2017.’ ”

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 39.6, is a severability clause.

Report on Premium Assistance Program Within AIDS Drug Assistance Program

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9G.3, provides: “Upon a determination by the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, that, in six months or less, it will no longer be feasible to operate the health insurance premium assistance program
implemented within the North Carolina AIDS Drug Assistance Program (ADAP) on a cost-neutral basis or in a manner that achieves savings to the State, the Department shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee
on Health and Human Services notifying the Committee of this determination along with supporting documentation and a proposed course of action with respect to health insurance premium assistance program participants.”

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(n), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult
Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of
Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the
departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(n), substituted “Department of Adult Correction” for “Department of Public Safety” three times in this section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 130A-5.
Duties of the Secretary.

The Secretary shall have the authority:

To enforce the State health laws and the rules of the Commission;

To investigate the causes of epidemics and of infectious, communicable and other diseases affecting the public health in order to control and prevent these diseases; to provide, under the rules of the Commission, for the prevention, detection, reporting
and control of communicable, infectious or any other diseases or health hazards considered harmful to the public health;

To develop and carry out reasonable health programs that may be necessary for the protection and promotion of the public health and the control of diseases. The Commission is authorized to adopt rules to carry out these programs;

To make sanitary and health investigations and inspections;

To investigate occupational health hazards and occupational diseases and to make recommendations for the elimination of the hazards and diseases. The Secretary shall work with the Industrial Commission and shall file sufficient reports with the Industrial
Commission to enable it to carry out all of the provisions of the Workers’ Compensation Act with respect to occupational disease.

To receive donations of money, securities, equipment, supplies, realty or any other property of any kind or description which shall be used by the Department for the purpose of carrying out its public health programs;

To acquire by purchase, devise or otherwise in the name of the Department equipment, supplies and other property, real or personal, necessary to carry out the public health programs;

To use the official seal of the Department. Copies of documents in the possession of the Department may be authenticated with the seal of the Department, attested by the signature or a facsimile of the signature of the Secretary, and when authenticated
shall have the same evidentiary value as the originals;

To disseminate information to the general public on all matters pertaining to public health; to purchase, print, publish, and distribute free, or at cost, documents, reports, bulletins and health informational materials. Money collected from the distribution
of these materials shall remain in the Department to be used to replace the materials;

To be the health advisor of the State and to advise State officials in regard to the location, sanitary construction and health management of all State institutions; to direct the attention of the State to health matters which affect the industries, property,
health and lives of the people of the State; to inspect at least annually State institutions and facilities; to make a report as to the health conditions of these institutions or facilities with suggestions and recommendations
to the appropriate State agencies. It shall be the duty of the persons in immediate charge of these institutions or facilities to furnish all assistance necessary for a thorough inspection;

To establish a schedule of fees based on income to be paid by a recipient for services provided by Migrant Health Clinics and Development Evaluation Centers;

To establish fees for the sale of specimen containers, vaccines and other biologicals. The fees shall not exceed the actual cost of such items, plus transportation costs;

To establish a fee to cover costs of responding to requests by employers for industrial hygiene consultation services and occupational consultation services. The fee shall not exceed two hundred dollars ($200.00) per on site inspection; and

To establish a fee for companion animal certificate of examination forms to be distributed, upon request, by the Department to licensed veterinarians. The fee shall not exceed the cost of the form and shipping costs.

To establish a fee not to exceed the cost of analyzing clinical Pap smear specimens sent to the State Laboratory by local health departments and State-owned facilities and for reporting the results of the analysis. This fee shall be in addition to the
charge for the Pap smear test kit.

To charge a fee of up to seventy-four dollars ($74.00) for analyzing private well-water samples sent to the State Laboratory of Public Health by local health departments. The fee shall be imposed for analyzing samples from newly constructed and existing
wells. The fee shall be computed annually by the Director of the State Laboratory of Public Health by analyzing the previous year’s testing at the State Laboratory of Public Health, and applying the amount of the total cost of
the private well-water testing, minus State appropriations that support this effort. The fee includes the charge for the private well-water panel test kit.

History.
1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1961, c. 51, s. 4; c. 833, s. 14; 1969, c. 982; 1973, c. 476, ss. 128, 138; 1979, c. 714, s. 2; 1981, c. 562, s. 4; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1985, c. 470, s. 1; 1991, c. 227, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994),
c. 715, s. 1; 2003-284, s. 34.13(a); 2006-66, s. 10.20(a); 2007-115, s. 2; 2014-100, s. 12E.3(a).

Cross References.

As to policy prohibiting tobacco use in community college buildings, grounds, and at community college-sponsored events, see

G.S. 115D-20.1(c)

.

§ 130A-5.1.
State health standards.

The Secretary shall adopt measurable standards and goals for community health against which the State’s actions to improve the health status of its citizens will be measured. The Secretary shall report annually to the General Assembly upon its convening
or reconvening and to the Governor on all of the following:

How the State compares to national health measurements and established State goals for each standard. Comparisons shall be reported using disaggregated data for health standards.

Steps taken by State and non-State entities to meet established goals.

Additional steps proposed or planned to be taken to achieve established goals.

The Secretary may coordinate and contract with other entities to assist in the establishment of standards and preparation of the report. The Secretary may use resources available to implement this section.

History.
2000-67, s. 11.

§ 130A-6.
Delegation of authority.

Whenever authority is granted by this Chapter upon a public official, the authority may be delegated to another person authorized by the public official.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-7.
Grants-in-aid.

The State is authorized to accept, allocate and expend any grants-in-aid for public health purposes which may be made available to the State by the federal government. This Chapter is to be liberally construed in order that the State and its citizens
may benefit fully from these grants-in-aid. The Commission is authorized to adopt rules, not inconsistent with the laws of this State, as required by the federal government for receipt of federal funds. Any federal funds received are
to be deposited with the State Treasurer and are to be appropriated by the General Assembly for the public health purposes specified.

History.
1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-8.
Counties to recover indirect costs on certain federal public health or mental health grants.

The Department shall include in its request for federal funds applicable to public health or mental health grants from the federal government to the State or any of its agencies, indirect costs incurred by counties acting as subgrantees under the grants
or otherwise providing services to the Department with regard to the grants to the full extent permitted by OMB Circular A-87 or its successor. The Department shall allow counties to claim and recover their indirect costs on these
grants to the full extent permitted by the Circular.

This section shall not apply to those federal public health or mental health grants which are formula grants to the State or which are otherwise limited as to the maximum amounts receivable on a statewide basis.

History.
1977, c. 876, ss. 1, 2; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-9.
Standards.

The Commission is authorized to establish reasonable standards governing the nature and scope of public health services rendered by local health departments.

History.
1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1973, c. 110; 1975, c. 83; 1979, c. 504, s. 15; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-10.
Advisory Committees.

The Secretary is authorized to establish and appoint as many special advisory committees as may be necessary to advise and confer with the Department concerning the public health. Members of any special advisory committee shall serve without compensation
but may be allowed travel and subsistence expenses in accordance with

G.S. 138-6

.

History.
1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1975, c. 281; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-11.
Residencies in public health.

The Department shall establish a residency program designed to attract dentists into the field of public health and to train them in the specialty of public health practice. The program shall include practical experience in public health principles and
practices.

History.
1975, c. 945, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1991, c. 342, s. 6.

§ 130A-12.
Confidentiality of records.

All records containing privileged patient medical information, information protected under 45 Code of Federal Regulations Parts 160 and 164, and information collected under the authority of Part 4 of Article 5 of this Chapter that are in the possession
of the Department of Health and Human Services or local health departments shall be confidential and shall not be public records pursuant to

G.S. 132-1

. Notwithstanding

G.S. 8-53

, the information contained in the records may be disclosed for purposes of treatment, payment, research, or health care operations to the extent that disclosure is permitted under 45 Code of Federal Regulations §§ 164.506
and 164.512(i). For purposes of this section, the terms “treatment,” “payment,” “research,” and “health care operations” have the meanings given those terms in 45 Code of Federal Regulations § 164.501.

History.
1985, c. 470, s. 2; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 890, s. 9; 1995, c. 428, s. 1.1; 2004-80, s. 4; 2006-255, s. 13.2; 2011-145, s. 13.3(qq); 2011-314, s. 3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-80, s. 4, effective July 8, 2004, inserted “or information protected under 45 C.F.R. Parts 160 and 164” in the first sentence; and added the second through fourth sentences.

Session Laws 2006-255, s. 13.2, effective August 23, 2006, in the first sentence, deleted “or” following the first occurrence of “information,” substituted “Code of Federal Regulations” for “C.F.R.,” inserted “and information collected under the authority
of Part 4 of Article 5 of this Chapter,” inserted “of Health and Human Services, the Department of Environment and Natural Resources” and made minor punctuation changes; and substituted “Code of Federal Regulations” for “C.F.R.” near
the end of the last sentence.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3(qq), effective July 1, 2011, deleted “the Department of Environment and Natural Resources” following “Department of Health and Human Services” in the first sentence.

Session Laws 2011-314, s. 3, effective January 1, 2012, in the third sentence, deleted “or

G.S. 130A-143

” following “G.S. 8-53” and substituted “payment, research, or health care operations to the extent that disclosure is permitted under 45 Code of Federal Regulations §§ 164.506 and 164.512(i)” for “payment, or health
care operations,” and in the last sentence, inserted “ ‘research’.”